dev/kaa.Latn_2016-Latn_1991.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 

%{'%}

LEXICON Root 

Alpha ; 
Punct ; 
Digits ;

LEXICON AlphaLoop 

Alpha ;
%- Alpha ; 
 # ;

LEXICON Alpha

a:a AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
á:aʻ AlphaLoop "weight: 0.5" ;
b:b AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ch:ch AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;  ! FIXME
c:ts AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;   ! FIXME
d:d AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
e:e AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
f:f AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
g:g AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ǵ:gʻ AlphaLoop "weight: 0.5" ;
h:h AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
i:i AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ı:ı AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
İ:İ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
I:I AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
j:j AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
k:k AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
l:l AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
m:m AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
n:n AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
ń:nʻ AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
o:o AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ó:oʻ AlphaLoop "weight: 0.5" ;
p:p AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
q:q AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
r:r AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
s:s AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;     ! FIXME
sh:sh AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;   ! FIXME
t:t AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
u:u AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ú:uʻ AlphaLoop "weight: 0.5" ;
v:v AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
w:w AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
x:x AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
y:y AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
z:z AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
ʻ:ʻ AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ;

LEXICON Digits

<[%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+> # ;

LEXICON Punct

%.:%. # ; 
%-:%- # ; 
%,:%, # ; 
%;:%; # ; 
%::%: # ; 
%!:%! # ; 
%?:%? # ; 
%“:%“ # ; 
%”:%” # ; 
%«:%« # ; 
%»:%» # ; 
%(:%( # ; 
%):%) # ; 
%–:%– # ; 
